Maryland, session 2026, HB0689.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That, notwithstanding § 5–303(a)(1) of the Election Law Article, for the statewide election
held in 2026, a candidate for Representative in Congress shall file a certificate of candidacy
not later than 9 p.m. on March 20, 2026.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act is an emergency
measure, is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public health or safety, has
been passed by a yea and nay vote supported by three–fifths of all the members elected to
each of the two Houses of the General Assembly, and shall take effect from the date it is
enacted.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0689*